Utah statutes.
31A-11-104.   Applicability of other portions of this title.

(1)  In addition to this chapter, motor clubs are subject to the applicable sections of:

(a)  Chapters 1, 2, 4, 16, 21, 22, 26, 27, and 27a;

(b)  Chapter 3, Part 1;

(c)  Chapter 23a, Parts 1, 4, and 5; and

(d)  Section 31A-23a-207.

(2)  Sections 31A-14-204 and 31A-14-216 apply to nondomestic motor clubs.

(3)  Section 31A-5-401 applies to domestic motor clubs.

(4)  Sections 31A-5-105, 31A-5-106, and 31A-5-216 apply to both domestic and nondomestic motor clubs.

(5)  Both domestic and nondomestic motor clubs are subject to the department fees under Section 31A-3-103.  Other provisions of this title apply to motor clubs only as specifically provided in this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 309, 2007 General Session

